Hawaii statutes.
§11‑4 Rules and regulations. The
chief election officer may make, amend, and repeal such rules and regulations
governing elections held under this title, election procedures, and the
selection, establishment, use, and operation of all voting systems now in use
or to be adopted in the State, and all other similar matters relating thereto
as in the chief election officer's judgment shall be necessary to carry out
this title.

In making, amending, and repealing rules and
regulations for voters who cannot vote at the polls in person and all other
voters, the chief election officer shall provide for voting by such persons in
such manner as to insure secrecy of the ballot and to preclude tampering with
the ballots of these voters and other election frauds. Such rules and
regulations, when adopted in conformity with chapter 91 and upon approval by
the governor, shall have the force and effect of law. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2;
gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Election officer not authorized to promulgate rule prohibiting
poll watchers from recording the names of those who have voted. 54 H. 254, 506
P.2d 13.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next